Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-1523
Tribal customary adoption; full faith and credit accorded.

A tribal customary adoption shall be accorded full faith and credit by the courts of this state and shall be treated in all respects as any other adoption for all other purposes under Nebraska law, except to the extent otherwise provided for in the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act.

Laws 2026, LB1032, § 28.
July 18, 2026